Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 10
FOUNDATION PROGRAM — STATE AID — APPORTIONMENT

Section.

33-1001. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrative schools” means and applies to all elementary schools and kindergartens within a district that are situated ten (10) miles or less from both the other elementary schools and the principal administrative office of the district and all secondary schools within a district that are situated fifteen (15) miles or less from other secondary schools of the district.

“Administrative staff” means those who hold an administrator certificate and are employed as a superintendent, an elementary or secondary school principal, or are assigned administrative duties over and above those commonly assigned to teachers.

“At-risk student” means a student in grades 6 through 12 who:

Meets at least three (3) of the following criteria:

Has repeated at least one (1) grade;

Has absenteeism greater than ten percent (10%) during the preceding semester;

Has an overall grade point average less than 1.5 on a 4.0 scale prior to enrolling in an alternative secondary program;

Has failed one (1) or more academic subjects in the past year;

Is below proficient, based on local criteria, standardized tests, or both;

Is two (2) or more credits per year behind the rate required to graduate or for grade promotion; or

Has attended three (3) or more schools within the previous two (2) years, not including dual enrollment; or

Meets any of the following criteria:

Has documented substance abuse or a pattern of substance abuse;

Is pregnant or a parent;

Is an emancipated youth or unaccompanied youth;

Is a previous dropout;

Has a serious personal, emotional, or medical issue or issues;

Has a court or agency referral; or

Demonstrates behavior detrimental to the student’s academic progress.

“Average daily attendance” or “pupils in average daily attendance” means the aggregate number of days enrolled students are present, divided by the number of days of school in the reporting period; provided, however, that students for whom no Idaho school district is a home district shall not be considered in such computation.

“Career ladder” means the compensation table used for determining the allocations districts receive for instructional staff and pupil service staff based on specific performance criteria and is made up of a residency compensation rung and a professional compensation rung.

“Child with a disability” means a child evaluated as having an intellectual disability, a hearing loss including deafness, a speech or language impairment, a visual impairment including blindness, an emotional behavioral disorder, an orthopedic impairment, autism, a traumatic brain injury, another health impairment, a specific learning disability, deaf-blindness, or multiple disabilities, and who, by reason thereof, needs special education and related services.

“Compensation rung” means the rung on the career ladder that corresponds with the compensation level performance criteria.
(8) “Economically disadvantaged student” means a student who:

“Economically disadvantaged student” means a student who:

Is eligible for a free or reduced-price lunch under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., excluding students who are only eligible through a school’s community eligibility program;

Resides with a family receiving assistance under the program of block grants to states for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) established under part A of title IV of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.;

Is eligible to receive medical assistance under the medicaid program under title XIX of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.; or

Is considered homeless for purposes of the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. 11301 et seq.

“Elementary grades” or “elementary average daily attendance” means and applies to students enrolled in grades 1 through 6, inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“Elementary schools” are schools that serve grades 1 through 6, inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“Elementary/secondary schools” are schools that serve grades 1 through 12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“English language learner” or “ELL” means a student who does not score proficient on the English language development assessment established by rule of the state board of education.

“Gifted and talented” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 33-2001(4), Idaho Code.

“Homebound student” means any student who would normally and regularly attend school, but is confined to home or hospital because of an illness or accident for a period of ten (10) or more consecutive days.

“Instructional staff” means those who hold an Idaho certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code, and who are either involved in the direct instruction of a student or group of students or who serve in a mentor or teacher leader position for individuals who hold an Idaho certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code.

“Kindergarten” or “kindergarten average daily attendance” means and applies to all students enrolled in a school year, less than a school year, or summer kindergarten program.

“Local salary schedule” means a compensation table adopted by a school district or public charter school, which table is used for determining moneys to be distributed for instructional staff and pupil service staff salaries. Minimum compensation provided under a local salary schedule shall be at least equal to thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($38,500) or, for staff holding a professional endorsement, forty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($42,500).

“Measurable student achievement” means the measurement of student academic achievement or growth within a given interval of instruction for those students who have been enrolled in and attended eighty percent (80%) of the interval of instruction. Measures and targets shall be chosen at the school level in collaboration with the staff member impacted by the measures and applicable district staff and approved at the district level. The most effective measures and targets are those generated as close to the actual work as possible. Targets may be based on grade- or department-level achievement or growth goals that create collaboration within groups. Assessment tools that may be used for measuring student achievement and growth include:

Idaho standards achievement test;

Student learning objectives;

Formative assessments;

Teacher-constructed assessments of student growth;

Pre- and post-tests;

Performance-based assessments;

Idaho reading indicator;

College entrance exams or preliminary college entrance exams such as PSAT, SAT and ACT;

District-adopted assessment;

End-of-course exams;

Advanced placement exams; and

Career technical exams.

“Performance criteria” means the standards specified for instructional staff and pupil service staff to demonstrate teaching proficiency for a given compensation rung. Each element of the professional compensation rung and advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria, as identified in this section and as applicable to a staff member’s position, shall be documented, reported, and subject to review for determining movement on the career ladder.

“Professional compensation rung performance criteria” means:
(20)(a) “Professional compensation rung performance criteria” means:

An overall rating of proficient or higher, and no components rated as unsatisfactory, on the state framework for teaching evaluation; and

Demonstrating the majority of students have met measurable student achievement targets or student success indicator targets.

“Advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria” means:

An overall rating of proficient or higher, no components rated as unsatisfactory or basic, and rated as distinguished overall in domain two — classroom environment, or domain three — instruction and use of assessment, on the state framework for teaching evaluation or equivalent for pupil service staff; and

Demonstrating seventy-five percent (75%) or more of their students have met their measurable student achievement targets or student success indicator targets.

“Public school district” or “school district” or “district” means any public school district organized under the laws of this state, including specially chartered school districts.

“Pupil service staff” means those who provide services to students but are not involved in direct instruction of those students, and hold a pupil personnel services certificate.

“Secondary grades” or “secondary average daily attendance” means and applies to students enrolled in grades 7 through 12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“Secondary schools” are schools that serve grades 7 through 12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“Separate elementary school” means an elementary school located more than ten (10) miles on an all-weather road from both the nearest elementary school and elementary/secondary school serving like grades within the same school district and from the location of the office of the superintendent of schools of such district, or from the office of the chief administrative officer of such district if the district employs no superintendent of schools.

“Separate kindergarten” means a kindergarten located more than ten (10) miles on an all-weather road from both the nearest kindergarten school within the same school district and from the location of the office of the superintendent of schools of such district, or from the office of the chief administrative officer of such district if the district employs no superintendent of schools.
(27) “Separate secondary school” means any secondary school located more than fifteen (15) miles on an all-weather road from any other secondary school and elementary/secondary school serving like grades operated by the district.

Quantifiable goals stated in a student’s 504 plan or individualized education plan.

Quantifiable goals stated in a student’s behavior improvement plan.

School- or district-identified measurable student objectives for a specified student group or population.

(28) “Special education” means specially designed instruction or speech/language therapy at no cost to the parent to meet the unique needs of a student who is a child with a disability, including instruction in the classroom, the home, hospitals, institutions, and other settings; instruction in physical education; speech therapy and language therapy; transition services; travel training; assistive technology services; and vocational education.

(29) “Student success indicators” means measurable indicators of student achievement or growth, other than academic, within a predefined interval of time for a specified group of students. Measures and targets shall be chosen at the district or school level in collaboration with the pupil service staff member impacted by the measures and applicable district staff. Student success indicators include:

(30) “Support program” means the educational support program as described in section 33-1002, Idaho Code, the transportation support program described in section 33-1006, Idaho Code, and the exceptional education support program as described in section 33-1007, Idaho Code.

(31) “Support unit” means a function of average daily attendance used in the calculations to determine financial support provided to the public school districts.

(32) “Teacher” means any person employed in a teaching, instructional, supervisory, educational administrative or educational and scientific capacity in any school district. In case of doubt, the state board of education shall determine whether any person employed requires certification as a teacher.

33-1002. Educational support program.

The educational support program is calculated as follows:

State Educational Support Funds. Add the state appropriation, including the moneys available in the public school income fund, together with all miscellaneous revenues to determine the total state funds.

From the total state funds subtract the following amounts needed for state support of special programs provided by a school district:

Pupil tuition-equivalency allowances as provided in section 33-1002B, Idaho Code;

Transportation support program as provided in section 33-1006, Idaho Code;

Feasibility studies allowance as provided in section 33-1007A, Idaho Code;

The approved costs for border district allowance, provided in section 33-1403, Idaho Code, as determined by the state superintendent of public instruction;

The approved costs for exceptional child approved contract allowance, provided in subsection 2. of section 33-2004, Idaho Code, as determined by the state superintendent of public instruction;

Salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in sections 33-1004 through 33-1004F, Idaho Code;

Unemployment insurance benefit payments according to the provisions of section 72-1349A, Idaho Code;

For expenditure as provided by the public school technology program;

For employee severance payments as provided in section 33-521, Idaho Code;

For distributions to the Idaho digital learning academy as provided in section 33-1020, Idaho Code;

For charter school facilities funds and reimbursements paid pursuant to section 33-5208(5), Idaho Code;

For an online course portal as provided for in section 33-1024, Idaho Code;

For advanced opportunities as provided for in chapter 46, title 33, Idaho Code;

For additional math and science courses for high school students as provided in section 33-1021, Idaho Code;

For leadership premiums as provided in section 33-1004J, Idaho Code;

For master teacher premiums as provided in section 33-1004I, Idaho Code;

For the support of provisions that provide a safe environment conducive to student learning and maintain classroom discipline, an allocation of three hundred dollars ($300) per support unit;

An amount specified in the appropriation bill for the public schools educational support program for counseling support as provided for in section 33-1212A, Idaho Code, shall be distributed for grades 8 through 12 as follows:

For school districts and public charter schools with one hundred (100) or more students enrolled in grades 8 through 12, a pro rata distribution based on students enrolled in grades 8 through 12 or eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000), whichever is greater;

For school districts and public charter schools with fewer than one hundred (100) students enrolled in grades 8 through 12, one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per student enrolled in grades 8 through 12 or nine thousand dollars ($9,000), whichever is greater;

An amount specified in the public schools educational support program appropriation bill for literacy intervention pursuant to section 33-1616, Idaho Code, the disbursements made to the school districts and public charter schools in the aggregate shall not exceed the total amount appropriated for this purpose and shall be based on the actual costs of such intervention programs. School districts and public charter schools shall be reimbursed in full or in pro rata based on the average number of students in kindergarten through grade 3 who score basic or below basic on the fall statewide reading assessment in the prior three (3) years;

For mastery-based education as provided for in section 33-1630 [33-1632], Idaho Code;

For pay for success contracting as provided in section 33-125B, Idaho Code; and

Any additional amounts as required by statute to effect administrative adjustments or as specifically required by the provisions of any bill of appropriation;

Average Daily Attendance. The total state average daily attendance shall be the sum of the average daily attendance of all of the school districts of the state. The state board of education shall establish rules setting forth the procedure to determine average daily attendance and the time for, and method of, submission of such report. Average daily attendance calculation shall be carried out to the nearest hundredth. Computation of average daily attendance shall also be governed by the provisions of section 33-1003A, Idaho Code.

Support Units. The total state support units shall be determined by using the tables set out hereafter called computation of kindergarten support units, computation of elementary support units, computation of secondary support units, computation of exceptional education support units, and computation of alternative school support units. The sum of all of the total support units of all school districts of the state shall be the total state support units.

to secure the total educational support distribution funds.

33-1002A. Fractional average daily attendance. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to rejection of Proposition 3 on November 6, 2012.

33-1002B. Pupil tuition-equivalency allowances.

Districts which educate pupils placed by Idaho court order in licensed homes, agencies, institutions or juvenile detention facilities shall be eligible for an allowance equivalent to forty-two percent (42%) of the previous year’s gross per pupil cost calculated on a daily basis. This district allowance shall be in addition to support unit funding and included in district apportionment payments, subject to approval of district applications by the state superintendent of public instruction.

Districts which educate pupils placed by Idaho court order in a juvenile detention facility with a summer school program shall be eligible for an allowance equivalent to one-half (½) of forty-two percent (42%) of the previous year’s gross per pupil cost calculated on a daily basis. This district allowance shall be in addition to support unit funding and included in district apportionment payments, subject to approval of district applications by the state superintendent of public instruction.

Districts which educate school age special education students who, due to the nature and severity of their disabilities, are residing in licensed public or private residential facilities or homes, and whose parents are not patrons of the district, shall be eligible for an allowance equivalent to forty-two percent (42%) of the previous year’s gross per pupil cost per child plus the excess cost rate that is annually determined by the state superintendent of public instruction. This district allowance shall be in addition to exceptional education support unit funding and included in district apportionment payments, subject to approval of district applications by the state superintendent of public instruction.

For school age special education students from outside the state of Idaho who, due to the nature and severity of their disabilities, are residing in licensed public or private residential facilities within the state of Idaho, the local school district shall provide education services to such students if requested by the licensed public or private residential facility, provided that the local school district has been given the opportunity to provide input on any federally required education plans for any such students. A local school district providing education services for such students shall sign a contract with any such licensed public or private residential facilities, which contract shall delineate the education services to be provided by the local school district and the amount to be paid by the licensed public or private residential facility. The amount paid shall be equal to the local school district’s full cost of providing the education services delineated by the contract, as determined by the local school district. Such students shall be excluded from all average daily attendance and other reports provided to the state that would result in the distribution of state funding to the local school district.

33-1002C. Summer and night school program support units — Alternative school — Juvenile detention facility.

Alternative summer or night school programs of not less than two hundred twenty-five (225) hours of instruction, which shall be included in the educational support units calculated as provided in section 33-1002, Idaho Code, may be established as approved by the state board of education. The average daily attendance divided by forty (40) shall determine the number of allowable support units which shall be included in the alternative school support units calculated for the school district for the succeeding school term.

For any alternative school designated pursuant to section 46-805, Idaho Code, full-term average daily attendance shall be used to calculate support units for each cohort of students that meets the minimum instructional hours requirement provided for in section 33-512, Idaho Code. The support units so calculated shall be used for all state funding formulas in which support units are used.

Districts that educate pupils placed by court order in a juvenile detention facility may establish a summer or night school program that shall be included in the educational support units calculated as provided in section 33-1002, Idaho Code. The average daily attendance divided by forty (40) shall determine the number of allowable support units that shall be included in the exceptional education school support units calculated for the school district for the succeeding school term.

Average daily attendance and the support units generated by this section shall not be included in or subject to the provisions of section 33-1003, Idaho Code, and shall be included as an addition to any other support units generated pursuant to Idaho Code.

33-1002D. Property tax replacement. [Repealed.]

33-1002E. Pupils attending school in another state.

In any school district which abuts upon the border of another state, the resident pupils of said district may attend schools in the other state as provided in section 33-1403, Idaho Code.

33-1002F. Alternative school report.

Annually, prior to the tenth legislative day, the department of education shall file with the legislature a report detailing the alternative school programs within the state. On July 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as feasible, each school district receiving moneys pursuant to the alternative school support units factor in section 33-1002, Idaho Code, or section 33-1002C, Idaho Code, shall file with the state department a comprehensive report of the amount of money received in the district, the expenditure on alternative school programs, and the programs provided. This information shall be compiled by the department for transmission to the legislature.

33-1002G. Career technical school funding and eligibility.

School districts and public charter schools may establish career technical schools that qualify for funding appropriated for the specific purpose of supporting the added cost of career technical schools. These funds will be appropriated to the state board for career technical education, to be expended by the division of career technical education. In order for a school to qualify for funding as a career technical school, it must make application to the division of career technical education on or before the fifteenth of April for the following fiscal year. This includes applicants for new schools and renewal applications. Approved public charter schools with career technical education programs will receive the same added cost unit as any other eligible school on an actual approved cost basis not to exceed the per-student cost for a traditional instructional delivery method. All career technical schools must meet all three (3) of the following criteria:

The school serves students from two (2) or more high schools. No one (1) high school can comprise more than eighty-five percent (85%) of the total enrolled career technical school students. In the event a student enrolled in the career technical school is not enrolled in a public high school, the eighty-five percent (85%) will be calculated based on the public high school attendance area where the student resides. This provision does not exclude a public charter school with a statewide boundary from applying for appropriate added cost funds authorized for career technical education, irrespective of the instructional delivery method.

The majority of the school’s program offerings lead to some form of postsecondary credit, such as dual credit or other advanced opportunities, as defined by the state board of education, or include apprenticeship opportunities.

All school programs offer at least one (1) supervised field experience for all students.

All career technical schools must also meet at least one (1) of the following three (3) requirements:

The school is funded separately from schools that qualify for computation using regular secondary support units.

The school has a separate and distinct governing board.

The majority of the school programs are provided at dedicated facilities that are separate from the regular high school facilities.

33-1003. Special application of educational support program.

Decrease in Average Daily Attendance. — For any school district that has a decrease in total average daily attendance of three percent (3%) or more of its average daily attendance in the current school year from the total average daily attendance used for determining the allowance in the educational support program for the prior school year, the allowance of funds from the educational support program may be based on the average daily attendance of the prior school year, less three percent (3%). When this provision is applied, the decrease in average daily attendance shall be proportionately distributed among the various categories of support units that are appropriate for the district. After applying the provisions of this subsection, the state department of education shall calculate the percentage of additional statewide support units to total statewide support units and shall then reduce each school district’s support units by this uniform percentage. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to public charter schools.

Application of Support Program to Separate Schools/Attendance Units in District.

Separate Elementary School. — Any separate elementary school shall be allowed to participate in the educational support program as though the school were the only elementary school operated by the district.

Hardship Elementary School. — Upon application of the board of trustees of a school district, the state board of education is empowered to determine that a given elementary school or elementary schools within the school district, not otherwise qualifying, are entitled to be counted as a separate elementary school as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, when, in the discretion of the state board of education, special conditions exist warranting the retention of the school as a separate attendance unit and the retention results in a substantial increase in cost per pupil in average daily attendance above the average cost per pupil in average daily attendance of the remainder of the district’s elementary grade school pupils. An elementary school operating as a previously approved hardship elementary school shall continue to be considered as a separate attendance unit, unless the hardship status of the elementary school is rescinded by the state board of education.

Separate Secondary School. — Any separate secondary school shall be allowed to participate in the educational support program as though the school were the only secondary school operated by the district.

Elementary/Secondary School Attendance Units. — Elementary grades in an elementary/secondary school will be funded as a separate attendance unit if all elementary grades served are located more than ten (10) miles distance by an all-weather road from both the nearest like elementary grades within the same school district and from the location of the office of the superintendent of schools of such district, or from the office of the chief administrative officer of such district if the district employs no superintendent of schools. Secondary grades in an elementary/secondary school will be funded as a separate attendance unit if all secondary grades served are located more than fifteen (15) miles by an all-weather road from the nearest like secondary grades operated by the district.

Hardship Secondary School. — Any district that operated two (2) secondary schools separated by less than fifteen (15) miles, but which district was created through consolidation subsequent to legislative action pursuant to chapter 111, laws of 1947, and which school buildings were constructed prior to 1935, shall be entitled to count the schools as separate attendance units.

Minimum Pupils Required. — Any elementary school having less than ten (10) pupils in average daily attendance shall not be allowed to participate in the state or county support program unless the school has been approved for operation by the state board of education.

Remote Schools. — The board of trustees of any Idaho school district that operates and maintains a school that is remote and isolated from the other schools of the state because of geographical or topographical conditions may petition the state board of education to recognize and approve the school as a remote and necessary school. The petition shall be in form and content approved by the state board of education and shall provide such information as the state board of education may require. Petitions for the recognition of a school as a remote and necessary school shall be filed annually at least ninety (90) days prior to the date of the regular June meeting of the board of trustees.

Support Program When District Boundaries are Changed.

In new districts formed by the division of a district, the support program computed for the district, divided in its last year of operation, shall be apportioned to the new districts created by the division in the proportion that the average daily attendance of pupils, elementary and secondary combined, residing in the area of each new district so created, is to the average daily attendance of all pupils, elementary and secondary combined, in the district divided in its last year of operation before the division.

When boundaries of districts are changed by excision or annexation of territory, the support program of any district from which territory is excised for the last year of operation before such excision shall be divided, and apportioned among the districts involved, as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Within forty-five (45) days after the receipt of a petition for the recognition of a remote and necessary school, the state board of education shall either approve or disapprove the petition and notify the board of trustees of its decision. Schools that the state board of education approves as being necessary and remote shall be allowed adequate funding within the support program for an acceptable educational program for the students of the school. In the case of a remote and necessary secondary school, grades 7-12, the educational program shall be deemed acceptable when, in the opinion of the state board of education, the accreditation standard relating to staff size, established in accordance with the provisions of section 33-119, Idaho Code, has been met. The final determination of an acceptable program and adequate funding in the case of a remote and necessary elementary school shall be made by the state board of education.

33-1003A. Calculation of average daily attendance.

In computing the average daily attendance the entire school year shall be used except that the twenty-eight (28) weeks having the highest average daily attendance, not necessarily consecutive, may be used. When a school is closed, or if a school remains open but attendance is significantly reduced because of storm, flood, failure of the heating plant, loss or damage to the school building, quarantine or order of any city, county or state health agency, or for reason believed by the board of trustees to be in the best interests of the health, safety or welfare of the pupils, the board of trustees having certified to the state department of education the cause and duration of such closure or impacted attendance, the average daily attendance for such day or days of closure or impacted attendance shall be considered as being the same as for the days when the school actually was in session or when attendance was not impacted. A decision by the state department to disallow such a consideration shall be subject to appeal to the state board of education.

For illness or accident that necessitates an absence from school for more than ten (10) consecutive school days, the school district may include homebound students in its total attendance, provided that academic instruction has been given by appropriate certified professional staff employed by the district.

33-1003B. Special application

Minimum support. [Repealed.]

33-1003C. Special application — Technological instruction.

In order to acquire and maintain technology for individualized computer and/or distance learning programs, a school district may use students’ documented contact hours on individualized computer education or distance learning programs in determining the district’s average daily attendance, whether the student is actually in the computer lab or distance learning center, or has logged on to the computer from another location. A district’s technology instruction programs shall be subject to the following provisions:

The certification requirements for an alternative school using the individualized computer education or distance learning program may be met by having a properly certificated teacher available on a consultant tutorial basis. The consultant tutors will be available by telephone, fax, e-mail, or in person at the school site on a daily basis.

Districts claiming average daily attendance pursuant to this section shall submit annual evaluations of the program to the state board of education.

Districts may offer individualized computer education or distance learning programs on a calendar which may differ from the rest of the district’s instruction, but in no case may a district claim more average daily attendance for a student than the full-time equivalency of a regular term of attendance for a single student.

Nonalternative high school students may receive individualized computer education or distance learning instruction and credit through an alternative school site.